Utah statutes.
9-4-1202.   Legislative policy and purpose.
(1)  It is the policy of the state that to promote the general welfare of its
citizens it is necessary to remedy the unsafe and unsanitary housing
conditions and the acute shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings for
families of medium and low income, in urban and rural areas.  These conditions
cause an increase and spread of disease and crime, and constitute a menace to
the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the state.
(2)  It is the policy of the state:
(a)  to make adequate provision of affordable housing for:
(i)  persons of medium or low income who are unable to provide themselves with
decent housing including:
(A)  elderly persons;
(B)  persons with disabilities;
(C)  veterans;
(D)  special needs populations;
(E)  low income persons living on tribal trust lands;
(F)  persons receiving public assistance under self-sufficiency programs; or
(G)  low income persons living in mobile homes, as defined in Section
70D-2-102; and
(ii)  during limited periods, for disaster victims; and
(b)  that the provision of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations at rents
or prices that persons of medium and low income can afford will materially
assist in developing more desirable neighborhoods and alleviating the effects
of poverty in this state.
(3)  The purposes of this part and Part 6, Housing Authorities, are to meet
these problems by:
(a)  providing low-cost housing for medium and low income persons; and
(b)  encouraging cooperation between political subdivisions and the nonprofit
sector to make available low-cost housing in all areas of the state.
(4)  It is in the public interest to use the broad financial resources and
technical services available to government in cooperation with the ingenuity
and expertise of private enterprise to alleviate this lack of safe and
sanitary dwellings while stimulating local industry, according to the
following principles:
(a)  The private sector, including nonprofit entities, shall be the primary
source of developing and providing affordable housing with state and local
incentives to encourage housing development.
(b)  State money used in the development of housing shall:
(i)  be heavily leveraged when possible;
(ii)  be primarily invested as loans;
(iii)  be primarily spent on housing production; and
(iv)  give priority to needs of persons of medium or low income who are unable
to provide themselves with decent housing including:
(A)  elderly persons;
(B)  persons with disabilities;
(C)  veterans;
(D)  special needs populations;
(E)  low income persons living on tribal trust lands;
(F)  persons receiving public assistance under self-sufficiency programs; and
(G)  low income persons living in mobile homes, as defined in Section
70D-2-102.
(c)  When possible based on economic feasibility and effectiveness, state
housing programs shall encourage:
(i)  mixed income developments;
(ii)  socio-economic diversity in neighborhoods; and
(iii)  new, multifamily construction.
(d)  State resources may be used in partnership with political subdivisions or
the private sector to promote affordable housing.
(e)  Within appropriations from the Legislature, the state may provide
training and technical assistance to Utah’s political subdivision, quasi-
governmental, and nonprofit housing providers.
